District of Columbia statutes.
2-223.07

Applicability.

(a)

This subchapter shall apply to actions taken after July 13, 1998.

(b)

This subchapter shall apply to employees of the WMATA when the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of Maryland enact similar provisions for WMATA whistleblowers.

History

Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 208, 45 DCR 5147

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1177.7.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 2-223.01.